Utah statutes.
78B-3-409.   Ad damnum clause prohibited in complaint.

A dollar amount may not be specified in the prayer of a complaint filed in a malpractice action against a health care provider.  The complaint shall merely pray for such damages as are reasonable in the circumstances.

